Utah statutes.
63G-6a-1105.   Form of bonds -- Effect of certified copy.

The form of the bonds required by this part shall be established by rule made by the applicable rulemaking authority.  Any person may obtain from the state a certified copy of a bond upon payment of the cost of reproduction of the bond and postage, if any.  A certified copy of a bond shall be prima facie evidence of the contents, execution, and delivery of the original.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session

